Maryland, session 2026, HB0053.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
10–621.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0053*

HOUSE BILL 53
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b)(2) of this section, this section does
not apply to:
(i) a research facility or federal research facility licensed under the
federal Animal Welfare Act;
(ii) the holder of a Class C Exhibitor’s License under the Animal
Welfare Act, 7 U.S.C. § 2131 et seq., that displays the animals specified in subsection (b) of
this section in a public setting as the exhibitor’s primary function;
(iii) a person who possesses a valid license or permit issued by the
Department of Natural Resources to import, sell, trade, barter, possess, breed, or exchange
an animal specified in subsection (b) of this section;
(iv) an animal sanctuary that:
1. is a nonprofit organization qualified under § 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code;
2. operates a place of refuge for abused, neglected,
impounded, abandoned, orphaned, or displaced wildlife;
3. does not conduct commercial activity with respect to any
animal of which the organization is an owner; and
4. does not buy, sell, trade, lease, or breed any animal except
as an integral part of the species survival plan of the [American Zoo and Aquarium
Association] ASSOCIATION OF ZOOS AND AQUARIUMS;
(v) an animal control officer under the jurisdiction of the State or a
local governing authority, a law enforcement officer acting under the authority of this
subtitle, or a private contractor of a county or municipal corporation that is responsible for
animal control operations;
(vi) a person who holds a valid license to practice veterinary medicine
in the State and treats the animal specified in subsection (b) of this section in accordance
with customary and normal veterinary practices;
(vii) a person who is not a resident of the State and is in the State for
[10 days] 48 HOURS or less for the purpose of traveling between locations outside of the
State; and
(viii) a circus holding a Class C Exhibitor’s License under the Animal
Welfare Act, 7 U.S.C. § 2131 et seq., that:
1. is in the State for less than 90 days per calendar year;

HOUSE BILL 53 3
2. regularly conducts performances featuring live animals
and multiple human entertainers, including acrobats and clowns; and
3. does not allow members of the public to be in proximity to
an animal specified under subsection (b) of this section, including opportunities to be
photographed with the animal, without sufficient distance and protective barriers.
(2) (i) This section does not prohibit a person who had lawful possession
of an animal specified in subsection [(b)] (B)(1)(I) THROUGH (VIII) of this section on or
before May 31, 2006, from continuing to possess that animal if the person provides written
notification to the local animal control authority on or before August 1, 2006.
(II) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT A PERSON WHO HAD
LAWFUL POSSESSION OF AN ANIMAL SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (B)(1)(IX) OR (X) OF
THIS SECTION ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, FROM CONTINUING TO POSSESS
THAT ANIMAL IF THE PERSON PROVIDES WRITTEN NOTIFICATION TO THE LOCAL
ANIMAL CONTROL AUTHORITY ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026.
[(ii)] (III) The notification shall include:
1. the person’s name, address, and telephone number;
2. the number and type of animals being kept; and
3. a photograph of the animal or a description of a tattoo or
microchip identification of the animal.
[(3) This section does not prohibit a person who has a disability that
severely limits mobility from possessing an animal specified in subsection (b) of this section
if that animal is:
(i) trained to perform tasks for the owner by an organization
described in Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(ii) dedicated to improving the quality of life of a person who has a
disability that severely limits mobility.]
(b) (1) A person may not import into the State, offer for sale, trade, barter,
possess, breed, or exchange a live:
(i) fox, skunk, raccoon, or bear;
(ii) caiman, alligator, or crocodile;
(iii) member of the cat family other than the domestic cat;

HOUSE BILL 53
(iv) hybrid of a member of the cat family and a domestic cat if the
hybrid weighs over 30 pounds;
(v) member of the dog family other than the domestic dog;
(vi) hybrid of a member of the dog family and a domestic dog;
(vii) nonhuman primate, including a lemur, monkey, chimpanzee,
gorilla, orangutan, marmoset, loris, or tamarin; [or]
(viii) poisonous snake in the family groups of Hydrophidae, Elapidae,
Viperidae, or Crotolidae;
(IX) KANGAROO, WALLAROO, OR WALLABY; OR
(X) ZEBRA.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.